Illinois, session 104th, SB2689.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Finance Authority Act is amended 5by changing Sections 825-65, 825-70, and 825-75 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 3501/825-65)7    Sec. 825-65. Clean Coal, Coal, Energy Efficiency, Energy 8Storage, PACE, and Renewable Energy Project Financing. 9    (a) Findings and declaration of policy.10        (i) It is hereby found and declared that Illinois has 11    abundant coal resources and, in some areas of Illinois, 12    the demand for power exceeds the generating capacity. 13    Incentives to encourage the construction of coal-fueled 14    electric generating plants in Illinois to ensure power 15    generating capacity into the future and to advance clean 16    coal technology and the use of Illinois coal are in the 17    best interests of all of the citizens of Illinois.18        (ii) It is further found and declared that Illinois 19    has abundant potential and resources to develop renewable 20    energy resource projects and energy storage projects and 21    that there are many opportunities to invest in 22    cost-effective energy efficiency projects throughout the 23    State. The development of those projects will create jobs   SB2689- 2 -LRB104 14818 JDS 27961 b1    and investment as well as decrease environmental impacts 2    and promote energy independence in Illinois. Accordingly, 3    the development of those projects is in the best interests 4    of all of the citizens of Illinois.5        (iii) The Authority is authorized to issue bonds to 6    help finance Clean Coal, Coal, Energy Efficiency, Energy 7    Storage, PACE, and Renewable Energy projects pursuant to 8    this Section.9    (b) Definitions.10        (i) "Clean Coal Project" means (A) "clean coal 11    facility", as defined in Section 1-10 of the Illinois 12    Power Agency Act; (B) "clean coal SNG facility", as 13    defined in Section 1-10 of the Illinois Power Agency Act; 14    (C) transmission lines and associated equipment that 15    transfer electricity from points of supply to points of 16    delivery for projects described in this subsection (b); 17    (D) pipelines or other methods to transfer carbon dioxide 18    from the point of production to the point of storage or 19    sequestration for projects described in this subsection 20    (b); or (E) projects to provide carbon abatement 21    technology for existing generating facilities. 22        (ii) "Coal Project" means new electric generating 23    facilities or new gasification facilities, as defined in 24    Section 605-332 of the Department of Commerce and Economic 25    Opportunity Law of the Civil Administrative Code of 26    Illinois, which may include mine-mouth power plants,   SB2689- 3 -LRB104 14818 JDS 27961 b1    projects that employ the use of clean coal technology, 2    projects to provide scrubber technology for existing 3    energy generating plants, or projects to provide electric 4    transmission facilities or new gasification facilities.5        (iii) "Energy Efficiency Project" means measures that 6    reduce the amount of electricity or natural gas required 7    to achieve a given end use, consistent with Section 1-10 8    of the Illinois Power Agency Act. "Energy Efficiency 9    Project" also includes measures that reduce the total Btus 10    of electricity and natural gas needed to meet the end use 11    or uses consistent with Section 1-10 of the Illinois Power 12    Agency Act.13        (iv) "Energy Storage Project" means a project that 14    uses technology for the storage of energy, including, 15    without limitation, the use of battery or electrochemical 16    storage technology for mobile or stationary applications. 17        (v) (iv) "Renewable Energy Project" means (A) a 18    project that uses renewable energy resources, as defined 19    in Section 1-10 of the Illinois Power Agency Act; (B) a 20    project that uses environmentally preferable technologies 21    and practices that result in improvements to the 22    production of renewable fuels, including but not limited 23    to, cellulosic conversion, water and energy conservation, 24    fractionation, alternative feedstocks, or reduced 25    greenhouse gas emissions; or (C) transmission lines and 26    associated equipment that transfer electricity from points   SB2689- 4 -LRB104 14818 JDS 27961 b1    of supply to points of delivery for projects described in 2    this subsection (b); or (D) projects that use technology 3    for the storage of renewable energy, including, without 4    limitation, the use of battery or electrochemical storage 5    technology for mobile or stationary applications. 6    (c) Creation of reserve funds. The Authority may establish 7and maintain one or more reserve funds to enhance bonds issued 8by the Authority for a Clean Coal Project, a Coal Project, an 9Energy Efficiency Project, an Energy Storage Project, a PACE 10Project, or a Renewable Energy Project. There may be one or 11more accounts in these reserve funds in which there may be 12deposited:13        (1) any proceeds of the bonds issued by the Authority 14    required to be deposited therein by the terms of any 15    contract between the Authority and its bondholders or any 16    resolution of the Authority;17        (2) any other moneys or funds of the Authority that it 18    may determine to deposit therein from any other source; 19    and20        (3) any other moneys or funds made available to the 21    Authority. Subject to the terms of any pledge to the 22    owners of any bonds, moneys in any reserve fund may be held 23    and applied to the payment of principal, premium, if any, 24    and interest of such bonds.25    (d) Powers and duties. The Authority has the power:26        (1) To issue bonds in one or more series pursuant to   SB2689- 5 -LRB104 14818 JDS 27961 b1    one or more resolutions of the Authority for any Clean 2    Coal Project, Coal Project, Energy Efficiency Project, 3    Energy Storage Project, PACE Project, or Renewable Energy 4    Project authorized under this Section, within the 5    authorization set forth in subsection (e).6        (2) To provide for the funding of any reserves or 7    other funds or accounts deemed necessary by the Authority 8    in connection with any bonds issued by the Authority.9        (3) To pledge any funds of the Authority or funds made 10    available to the Authority that may be applied to such 11    purpose as security for any bonds or any guarantees, 12    letters of credit, insurance contracts or similar credit 13    support or liquidity instruments securing the bonds.14        (4) To enter into agreements or contracts with third 15    parties, whether public or private, including, without 16    limitation, the United States of America, the State or any 17    department or agency thereof, to obtain any 18    appropriations, grants, loans or guarantees that are 19    deemed necessary or desirable by the Authority. Any such 20    guarantee, agreement or contract may contain terms and 21    provisions necessary or desirable in connection with the 22    program, subject to the requirements established by the 23    Act.24        (4.5) To make loans under subsection (i) of Section 25    801-40 to finance loans for PACE Projects. 26        (5) To exercise such other powers as are necessary or   SB2689- 6 -LRB104 14818 JDS 27961 b1    incidental to the foregoing.2    (e) Clean Coal Project, Coal Project, Energy Efficiency 3Project, Energy Storage Project, PACE Project, and Renewable 4Energy Project bond authorization and financing limits. In 5addition to any other bonds authorized to be issued under 6Sections 801-40(w), 825-60, 830-25 and 845-5, the Authority 7may have outstanding, at any time, bonds for the purpose 8enumerated in this Section 825-65 in an aggregate principal 9amount that shall not exceed $3,000,000,000, subject to the 10following limitations: (i) up to $300,000,000 may be issued to 11finance projects, as described in clause (C) of subsection 12(b)(iv) (i) and clause (C) of subsection (b)(v) (iv) of this 13Section 825-65; (ii) up to $500,000,000 may be issued to 14finance projects, as described in clauses (D) and (E) of 15subsection (b)(i) of this Section 825-65; (iii) up to 16$2,000,000,000 may be issued to finance Energy Storage 17Projects Clean Coal Projects, as described in clauses (A) and 18(B) of subsection (b)(iv) (b)(i) of this Section 825-65 and 19Coal Projects, as described in subsection (b)(ii) of this 20Section 825-65; and (iv) up to $2,000,000,000 may be issued to 21finance Clean Coal Projects, as described in subsection (b)(i) 22of this Section 825-65, Coal Projects, as described in 23subsection (b)(ii) of this Section 825-65, Energy Efficiency 24Projects, as described in subsection (b)(iii) of this Section 25825-65, Renewable Energy Projects, as described in clauses 26(A), (B), and (D) of subsection (b)(v) (iv) of this Section   SB2689- 7 -LRB104 14818 JDS 27961 b1825-65, and PACE Projects. An application for a loan financed 2from bond proceeds from a borrower or its affiliates for a 3Clean Coal Project, a Coal Project, Energy Efficiency Project, 4PACE Project, or a Renewable Energy Project may not be 5approved by the Authority for an amount in excess of 6$450,000,000 for any borrower or its affiliates. A Clean Coal 7Project, Coal Project, Energy Storage Project, or PACE Project 8must be located within the State. An Energy Efficiency Project 9may be located within the State or outside the State, provided 10that, if the Energy Efficiency Project is located outside of 11the State, it must be owned, operated, leased, or managed by an 12entity located within the State or any entity affiliated with 13an entity located within the State. These bonds shall not 14constitute an indebtedness or obligation of the State of 15Illinois and it shall be plainly stated on the face of each 16bond that it does not constitute an indebtedness or obligation 17of the State of Illinois, but is payable solely from the 18revenues, income or other assets of the Authority pledged 19therefor.20    (f) The bonding authority granted under this Section is in 21addition to and not limited by the provisions of Section 22845-5.23(Source: P.A. 100-201, eff. 8-18-17; 100-919, eff. 8-17-18.) 24    (20 ILCS 3501/825-70)25    Sec. 825-70. Criteria for participation in the program.   SB2689- 8 -LRB104 14818 JDS 27961 b1Applications to the Authority for financing of any Clean Coal, 2Coal, Energy Efficiency Project, Energy Storage Project, or 3Renewable Energy Project shall be reviewed by the Authority. 4Upon submission of any such application, the Authority staff 5shall review the application for its completeness and may, at 6the discretion of the Authority staff, request such additional 7information as it deems necessary or advisable to aid in 8review. If the Authority receives applications for financing 9for Clean Coal, Coal, Energy Efficiency Project, Energy 10Storage Project, or Renewable Energy Projects in excess of the 11bond authorization available for such financing at any one 12time, it shall consider applications in the order of priority 13as it shall determine, in consultation with other State 14agencies, and consistent with State policy to promote reliable 15energy supply, affordable energy prices, environmentally 16preferable technology, and energy independence.17(Source: P.A. 96-103, eff. 1-1-10; 96-817, eff. 1-1-10.) 18    (20 ILCS 3501/825-75)19    Sec. 825-75. Additional Security. In the event that the 20Authority determines that monies of the Authority will not be 21sufficient for the payment of the principal of and interest on 22any bonds issued by the Authority under Sections 825-65 23through 825-75 of this Act for Clean Coal Projects, Coal 24Projects, Energy Efficiency Projects, Energy Storage Projects, 25or Renewable Energy Projects during the next State fiscal   SB2689- 9 -LRB104 14818 JDS 27961 b1year, the Chairperson, as soon as practicable, shall certify 2to the Governor the amount required by the Authority to enable 3it to pay such principal, premium, if any, and interest on such 4bonds. The Governor shall submit the amount so certified to 5the General Assembly as soon as practicable, but no later than 6the end of the current State fiscal year. This subsection 7shall apply to any bonds or notes as to which the Authority 8shall have determined, in the resolution authorizing the 9issuance of the bonds or notes, that this subsection shall 10apply. Whenever the Authority makes such a determination, that 11fact shall be plainly stated on the face of the bonds or notes 12and that fact should also be reported to the Governor. In the 13event of a withdrawal of moneys from a reserve fund 14established with respect to any issue or issues of bonds of the 15Authority to pay principal, premium, if any, and interest on 16such bonds, the Chairman of the Authority, as soon as 17practicable, shall certify to the Governor the amount required 18to restore the reserve fund to the level required in the 19resolution or indenture securing those bonds. The Governor 20shall submit the amount so certified to the General Assembly 21as soon as practicable, but no later than the end of the 22current State fiscal year. The Authority shall obtain written 23approval from the Governor for any bonds and notes to be issued 24under this Section.25(Source: P.A. 95-470, eff. 8-27-07; 96-103, eff. 1-1-10; 2696-817, eff. 1-1-10.)